Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.605.020

Parents' access to classroom or school sponsored activities—Limitation.

Every school district board of directors shall, after following established procedure, adopt a policy assuring parents access to their child's classroom and/or school sponsored activities for purposes of observing class procedure, teaching material, and class conduct: PROVIDED, That such observation shall not disrupt the classroom procedure or learning activity.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 8. Formerly RCW 28A.58.053.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 250: See notes following RCW 28A.150.220.